Hawaii statutes.
[§431P-18] Exemption for Hawaiian
home lands. Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit or limit any person
from obtaining insurance for property subject to the Hawaiian Homes Commission
Act of 1920, as amended, from any insurer other than the fund if such insurance
is deemed sufficient by the commissioner. [L 1993, c 339, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next